Illinois, session 104th, SB4056.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act is 5amended by changing Section 75 as follows: 6    (210 ILCS 9/75)7    Sec. 75. Residency requirements. 8    (a) No individual shall be accepted for residency or 9remain in residence if the establishment cannot provide or 10secure appropriate services, if the individual requires a 11level of service or type of service for which the 12establishment is not licensed or which the establishment does 13not provide, or if the establishment does not have the staff 14appropriate in numbers and with appropriate skill to provide 15such services.16    (b) Only adults may be accepted for residency.17    (c) A person shall not be accepted for residency if:18        (1) the person poses a serious threat to himself or 19    herself or to others;20        (2) the person is not able to communicate his or her 21    needs and no resident representative residing in the 22    establishment, and with a prior relationship to the 23    person, has been appointed to direct the provision of   SB4056- 2 -LRB104 20045 BAB 33496 b1    services;2        (3) the person requires total assistance with 2 or 3    more activities of daily living;4        (4) the person requires the assistance of more than 5    one paid caregiver at any given time with an activity of 6    daily living;7        (5) the person requires more than minimal assistance 8    in moving to a safe area in an emergency;9        (6) the person has a severe mental illness, which for 10    the purposes of this Section means a condition that is 11    characterized by the presence of a major mental disorder 12    as classified in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of 13    Mental Disorders, Fourth Edition (DSM-IV) (American 14    Psychiatric Association, 1994), where the individual is a 15    person with a substantial disability due to mental illness 16    in the areas of self-maintenance, social functioning, 17    activities of community living and work skills, and the 18    disability specified is expected to be present for a 19    period of not less than one year, but does not mean 20    Alzheimer's disease and other forms of dementia based on 21    organic or physical disorders;22        (7) the person requires intravenous therapy or 23    intravenous feedings unless self-administered or 24    administered by a qualified, licensed health care 25    professional;26        (8) the person requires gastrostomy feedings unless   SB4056- 3 -LRB104 20045 BAB 33496 b1    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 2    care professional;3        (9) the person requires insertion, sterile irrigation, 4    and replacement of catheter, except for routine 5    maintenance of urinary catheters, unless the catheter care 6    is self-administered or administered by a licensed health 7    care professional or a nurse in compliance with education, 8    certification, and training in catheter care or infection 9    control by the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention 10    with oversight from an infection preventionist or 11    infection control committee;12        (10) the person requires sterile wound care unless 13    care is self-administered or administered by a licensed 14    health care professional;15        (11) (blank);16        (12) the person is a diabetic requiring routine 17    insulin injections unless the injections are 18    self-administered or administered by a licensed health 19    care professional;20        (13) the person requires treatment of stage 3 or stage 21    4 decubitus ulcers or exfoliative dermatitis;22        (14) the person requires 5 or more skilled nursing 23    visits per week for conditions other than those listed in 24    items (13) and (15) of this subsection for a period of 3 25    consecutive weeks or more except when the course of 26    treatment is expected to extend beyond a 3-week period for   SB4056- 4 -LRB104 20045 BAB 33496 b1    rehabilitative purposes and is certified as temporary by a 2    physician; or3        (15) other reasons prescribed by the Department by 4    rule.5    (d) A resident with a condition listed in items (1) 6through (15) of subsection (c) shall have his or her residency 7terminated.8    (e) Residency shall be terminated when services available 9to the resident in the establishment are no longer adequate to 10meet the needs of the resident. The establishment shall notify 11the resident and the resident's representative, if any, when 12there is a significant change in the resident's condition that 13affects the establishment's ability to meet the resident's 14needs. The requirements of subsection (c) of Section 80 shall 15then apply. This provision shall not be interpreted as 16limiting the authority of the Department to require the 17residency termination of individuals.18    (f) Subsection (d) of this Section shall not apply to 19terminally ill residents who receive or would qualify for 20hospice care and such care is coordinated by a hospice program 21licensed under the Hospice Program Licensing Act or other 22licensed health care professional employed by a licensed home 23health agency and the establishment and all parties agree to 24the continued residency. Establishments shall ensure that 25residents subject to this subsection receive care from a 26licensed health care professional available on-site 7 days per   SB4056- 5 -LRB104 20045 BAB 33496 b1week, 24 hours per day to meet the medical, nursing, and mental 2and psychosocial care needs of the resident. 3    (g) Items (3), (4), (5), and (9) of subsection (c) shall 4not apply to a quadriplegic, paraplegic, or individual with 5neuro-muscular diseases, such as muscular dystrophy and 6multiple sclerosis, or other chronic diseases and conditions 7as defined by rule if the individual is able to communicate his 8or her needs and does not require assistance with complex 9medical problems, and the establishment is able to accommodate 10the individual's needs. The Department shall prescribe rules 11pursuant to this Section that address special safety and 12service needs of these individuals.13    (h) For the purposes of items (7) through (10) of 14subsection (c), a licensed health care professional may not be 15employed by the owner or operator of the establishment, its 16parent entity, or any other entity with ownership common to 17either the owner or operator of the establishment or parent 18entity, including but not limited to an affiliate of the owner 19or operator of the establishment. Nothing in this Section is 20meant to limit a resident's right to choose his or her health 21care provider.22    (i) Subsection (h) is not applicable to residents admitted 23to an assisted living establishment under a life care contract 24as defined in the Life Care Facilities Act if the life care 25facility has both an assisted living establishment and a 26skilled nursing facility. A licensed health care professional   SB4056- 6 -LRB104 20045 BAB 33496 b1providing health-related or supportive services at a life care 2assisted living or shared housing establishment must be 3employed by an entity licensed by the Department under the 4Nursing Home Care Act or the Home Health, Home Services, and 5Home Nursing Agency Licensing Act. 6(Source: P.A. 103-444, eff. 1-1-24; 103-844, eff. 7-1-25; 7104-191, eff. 1-1-26.)